Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2817
Nonrefundable payments, benefits, or damages, defined.

Nonrefundable payments, benefits, or damages shall mean those payments, benefits, or damages which are not required to be refunded in event of recovery of damages pursuant to sections 44-2801 to 44-2855.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 17.